Massachusetts, session 194th, S2066.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subparagraph (19) of paragraph (a) of section 3 of chapter 62 of the general laws, as
appearing in the 2022 official edition, is hereby amended by striking out the figure “$1,000” and
inserting in place thereof the following: “$5,000”.
Said subparagraph, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by striking out the figure
“$2,000” and inserting in place thereof the following “$10,000”.
of 1